Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 2
TURNPIKES

43-3-201. Legislative declaration.

The development and improvement of the public highways and roads within the state of Colorado being essential to the well-being and prosperity of the state and the inhabitants thereof, it is declared to be the policy and purpose of the general assembly to provide for such development and improvement by conferring additional powers on the department of transportation as a body corporate under the laws of the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 601, § 1.

CSA:

C. 143, § 125(1).

CRS 53:

§ 120-8-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1112, § 161, effective July 1.

43-3-202. Powers granted to department.

In addition to the powers now possessed by it, the department of transportation has power:

To formulate, by its own initiative or by recommendation of the governor, plans for the development and improvement of the state highway system by the construction of turnpikes within the state and to conduct engineering surveys and perform any other acts necessary in determining the feasibility of such plans. "Turnpike" means any highway or express highway, tunnel, or toll tunnel constructed under the provisions of this part 2 and includes all bridges, tunnels, overpasses, underpasses, interchanges, entrance plazas, approaches, toll houses, service stations, and administration, storage, and other buildings which the department of transportation may deem necessary for the operation of such turnpike, together with all property, rights, easements, and interests which may be acquired by the department of transportation for the construction or the operation of such turnpike.

To design, finance, construct, operate, maintain, improve, and reconstruct turnpikes in the state and to acquire, construct, operate, control, and use the turnpikes and all works, facilities, and means necessary or convenient to the full exercise of the powers granted in this section. It is declared that such turnpikes are public highways of the state.

To take all steps and adopt all proceedings and to make and enter into all contracts or agreements with other states, the United States, or any of its agencies, instrumentalities, or departments, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the reconstruction finance corporation or with public corporations within the state necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this part 2; but any contract relating to the financing of any such construction, maintenance, improvement, or reconstruction shall be approved by the governor before the same becomes effective;

To make and enter into contracts or agreements with one or more public or private entities to design, finance, construct, operate, maintain, reconstruct, or improve a turnpike project by means of a public-private initiative pursuant to section 43-3-202.5 and part 12 of article 1 of this title;

To establish, revise periodically, and collect fees, fares, and tolls for the privilege of traveling along and over the turnpikes and for such other uses as may be made available by the establishment of such turnpikes, to adopt such rules governing the use of the turnpikes as the department of transportation may determine to be advisable, and to exercise such other powers and authority as may be necessary or convenient to the practical and full operation and use thereof;

To set aside in a special sinking fund and to pledge any and all fees, fares, and tolls and all income however derived to the payment of the principal of and the interest on the bonds authorized in this part 2 to be issued;

To set aside in a special sinking fund and to pledge from the proceeds in the state highway fund derived from the imposition of licenses, registration, and other charges with respect to the operation of any motor vehicle upon any public highway of the state and the proceeds from the imposition of any excise tax on gasoline or other liquid motor fuel an amount sufficient to insure the payment of the principal and interest on the bonds authorized in this part 2 to be issued promptly as the same respectively become due; except that any such pledge shall first be approved by joint resolution of the senate and house of representatives and further except that the amount so set aside and pledged shall not exceed in any one year one hundred percent of the total of the following:

The amount of principal and interest falling due during such year; and

The amount required to be paid into the special sinking fund as a reasonable reserve for the payment of the bonds authorized in this part 2 in accordance with the resolution of the transportation commission authorizing their issuance as approved by the joint resolution of the senate and house of representatives.

To accept grants and permits from and to cooperate with the United States or any agency, instrumentality, or department thereof in the construction, reconstruction, maintenance, improvement, operation, and financing of turnpikes or their appurtenances and to do all things necessary to avail itself of such cooperation;

To designate as a turnpike project a described territory or a described portion of the highway system of the state to be constructed or improved under this part 2;

To cooperate, negotiate, and contract with other states in any manner necessary to effect the purposes of this part 2;

To require that each contractor to whom is awarded any contract for the construction, erection, repair, maintenance, or improvement of any turnpike, as defined in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), shall, before entering upon the performance of any work included in said contract, execute, deliver to, and file with the department of transportation a good and sufficient bond to be approved by the department of transportation in an amount to be fixed by the department of transportation, which amount shall be not less than twenty-five percent of the total amount payable by the terms of said contract. Such bond shall be duly executed by a qualified corporate surety, conditioned for the faithful performance of the contract according to the terms thereof, and, in addition, shall provide that, if the contractor or his subcontractors fail to duly pay for any labor, materials, motor vehicle or team hire, sustenance, provisions, provender, or other supplies used or consumed by such contractor or his subcontractor or contractors in performance of the work contracted to be done, the surety will pay the same in an amount not exceeding the sum specified in the bond, together with interest at the rate of eight percent per annum.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 601, § 2.

CSA:

C. 143, § 125(2).

CRS 53:

§ 120-8-2.

L. 54:

pp. 151, 154, 155, §§ 1, 1-3.

L. 56, 1st Ex. Sess.:

pp. 28, 36, 37, §§ 1, 1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-2.

L. 84:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 1112, § 1, effective April 9.

L. 91:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(d), (1)(f)(II), and (1)(j) amended, p. 1112, § 162, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1)(b), (1)(d), and (1)(f) amended and (1)(c.5) added, p. 461, § 1, effective April 23.

43-3-202.5. Public-private initiatives - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The department of transportation is in need of funds to invest in new infrastructure projects, including turnpikes, within the state transportation system, and public-private partnerships can provide the state with a new source of capital for such projects;

Privately-developed transportation projects can result in time and cost savings, risk reduction, and new tax revenues to the state; and

Public-private agreements can be utilized by the state not only for the development of new turnpikes but also for the modernization and improvement of existing turnpikes.

The department of transportation may enter into public-private initiatives pursuant to part 12 of article 1 of this title for the following purposes:

To design, finance, construct, and operate a new turnpike project within the state; or

To improve an existing turnpike project in the state by modernizing, upgrading, expanding, or maintaining an existing turnpike facility.

The department of transportation is authorized to solicit and consider proposals, enter into agreements, grant public benefits, and accept contributions for public-private initiatives pursuant to part 12 of article 1 of this title concerning the purposes set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

As used in this subsection (3), "public benefit" has the same meaning as set forth in section 43-1-1201 (2).

A public-private initiative under this section shall include a provision that the public or private entity shall secure and maintain liability insurance coverage during the construction and improvement of any turnpike project in amounts appropriate to protect a project's viability.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 462, § 2, effective April 23.

L. 2007:

(3)(a) amended, p. 2051, § 105, effective June 1.

43-3-203. Bonds authorized.

For the purpose of defraying the cost of constructing, improving, or reconstructing any such turnpike and all expenses incidental thereto, including all engineering and legal fees and interest during construction and for one year thereafter, the department of transportation may, upon the affirmative majority vote of the entire membership of the transportation commission and with the approval of the general assembly evidenced by joint resolution of the senate and house of representatives, and signed by the governor, issue bonds of the state of Colorado, payable from a fund consisting of the fees, fares, and tolls derived from any designated turnpike project and with the approval of the general assembly evidenced by joint resolution of the senate and house of representatives, additionally secured by a pledge of and payable from a special fund set aside from the state highway fund, but the amount so set aside and pledged shall not exceed in any one year one hundred percent of the total of the following:

The amount of principal and interest falling due during such year; and

The amount required to be paid into the special sinking fund as a reasonable reserve for the payment of the bonds authorized in this part 2 in accordance with the resolution of the transportation commission authorizing their issuance as approved by the joint resolution of the senate and house of representatives.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 603, § 3.

CSA:

C. 143, § 125(3).

CRS 53:

120-8-3.

L. 54:

p. 155, § 4.

L. 56, Ex. Sess.:

p. 38, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-3.

L. 84:

IP(1) amended, p. 1112, § 2, effective April 9.

L. 91:

IP(1) and (1)(b) amended, p. 1113, § 163, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 463, § 3, effective April 23.

Cross references:

For presentation of resolutions to the governor, see § 39 of art. V, Colo. Const.

43-3-204. Bond details.

All bonds issued under the provisions of this part 2 shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding a maximum net effective rate authorized by resolution of the transportation commission on the face value of the issue of bonds and shall be in such form and executed in such manner and shall be payable at such times extending not more than thirty years from the date thereof, shall contain the provisions for prior redemption, and shall be payable at such places as the department of transportation determines. The bonds shall be sold at public or private sale on such terms as the department of transportation may determine. In case any of the officers whose signatures or countersignatures appear on the bonds or the coupons attached thereto cease to be officers before delivery of the bonds, the signatures and countersignatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes with the same force and effect as if they had remained in office until the delivery. The bonds shall contain on their face the designation of the project as determined by the department of transportation and in anticipation of the revenues of which the same are issued. All bonds issued under the provisions of this part 2 shall have and are declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the law of the state.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 604, § 4.

CSA:

C. 143, § 125(4).

CRS 53:

§ 120-8-4.

L. 56, Ex. Sess.:

p. 38, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-4.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 1113, § 3, effective April 9.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1114, § 164, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 463, § 4, effective April 23.

Cross references:

For negotiable instruments, see article 3 of title 4.

43-3-205. Trust indentures.

In the discretion of the department of transportation, such bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the department of transportation and a corporate trustee which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside of the state. Such trust indentures may pledge or assign tolls and revenue to be received from the operation of the turnpike project but shall not convey or mortgage the turnpike or any part thereof. The resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds or such trust indenture may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, covenants setting forth the duties of the department of transportation in relation to the acquisition of properties and the construction, maintenance, operation, repair, and insurance of the turnpike project and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys. Such indenture may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee and may restrict the individual right of action of bondholders. In addition to the foregoing, such trust indenture may contain such other provisions as the department of transportation may deem reasonable for the security of bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out such trust indenture may be treated as a part of the cost of maintenance, operation, and repair of the turnpike project.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 604, § 5.

CSA:

C. 143, § 125(5).

CRS 53:

§ 120-8-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-5.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1114, § 165, effective July 1.

43-3-206. Payment of bonds - use and disposition of fund.

At or before the issuance of any bonds under the provisions of this part 2, the department of transportation shall, by resolution of the transportation commission:

Establish a schedule of fees, fares, and tolls to be charged for the use of the project; and

Create a special sinking fund in the state treasury for the payment of the principal of and the interest on the bonds authorized to be issued promptly as the same, respectively, become due.

Into the fund there shall be set aside and pledged by the department of transportation all the fees, fares, and tolls and all other income however derived resulting from the operation of the project and all moneys authorized to be set aside and pledged from the state highway fund not exceeding in any one year one hundred percent of the total of the following:

The amount of principal and interest falling due during such year; and

The amount required to be paid into the special sinking fund as a reasonable reserve for the payment of the bonds authorized in this part 2 in accordance with the resolution of the transportation commission authorizing their issuance as approved by the joint resolution of the senate and house of representatives.

The department of transportation may, by resolution of the transportation commission passed prior to the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture, covenant to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating any turnpike constructed under the provisions of this part 2, and, inasmuch as such turnpike will at all times belong to the state, such resolution shall have the force of contract between the state and the holders of the bonds issued for such turnpike.

To the extent that the fund provided for in this section is not required for the payment of bonds and the creation of a reserve fund and a sinking fund, the same shall be used to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating the turnpike project pursuant to section 43-3-212.5. Nothing in this section shall be construed as impairing the obligation of the state to maintain and operate any such turnpike project as a state highway.

The bonds issued under this part 2 shall constitute an irrevocable charge against the special sinking fund. Separate accounts shall be kept in the office of the state treasury of the funds derived from each project against the revenues of which bonds are issued under this part 2. The resolution of the transportation commission may contain such other provisions or covenants not inconsistent with the provisions of this part 2 as the department of transportation may consider advisable to insure the payment of the bonds.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 606, § 6.

CSA:

C. 143, § 125(6).

CRS 53:

§ 120-8-6.

L. 56, 1st Ex. Sess.:

p. 39, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-6.

L. 91:

IP(1), (1)(b), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1115, § 166, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 464, § 5, effective April 23.

43-3-207. Bond lien.

All bonds issued pursuant to section 43-3-203 shall constitute a first lien on all or any part of the moneys pledged or set aside under sections 43-3-202 (1)(f) and 43-3-203; except that the department of transportation may provide preferential security for any bonds to be issued under section 43-3-203 over any bonds that may be issued under section 43-3-203 thereafter. No moneys which may, from time to time, be credited to the state highway fund which are derived from sources other than those described in section 43-3-202 (1)(f) or 43-3-203 shall be applied to the payment of the bonds issued pursuant to section 43-3-203.

Any pledge made by the department of transportation to secure the payment of bonds issued pursuant to section 43-3-203 shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made. The revenues, moneys, and funds so pledged shall immediately be subject to lien of such pledge without any physical delivery or further act, and the lien of such pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort or contract or otherwise against the department of transportation, irrespective of whether such parties have notice of such lien. Each pledge, agreement, and resolution made for the benefit or security of any of the bonds issued pursuant to section 43-3-203 shall continue to be effective until the principal of and interest on the bonds for the benefit of which the same are made has been fully paid or provision for such payment has been duly made.

Any resolution of the transportation commission for the issuance of bonds pursuant to section 43-3-203 may contain the provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the holders of any of the bonds as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the department of transportation in relation to the purposes to which proceeds of the bonds may be applied, the terms and conditions for the issuance of additional bonds, and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys. Any such resolution may set forth the rights and remedies of the holders of any bonds and may restrict the individual right of action by any such holders. In addition, any such resolution may contain any other provisions as the department of transportation may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the holders of any bonds. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of the resolution may be paid from the revenues or assets pledged or assigned to the payment of the bonds. In the event of default in any such payment or in any agreements of the department of transportation made as part of the contract under which the bonds were issued or contained in the resolution concerning the bonds, the payment or agreement may be enforced by suit, mandamus, or either of the remedies.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 606, § 7.

CSA:

C. 143, § 125(7).

CRS 53:

§ 120-8-7.

L. 56, 1st Ex. Sess.:

p. 40, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-7.

L. 84:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1113, § 4, effective April 9.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1115, § 167, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(3) amended, p. 465, § 6, effective April 23.

43-3-208. Bond proceeds.

All moneys received from any bonds issued pursuant to this part 2 shall be applied solely to the payment of the cost of the turnpike project or to the appurtenant fund, and there is hereby created and granted a lien upon such moneys until so applied in favor of holders of such bonds or the trustee provided for in respect of such bonds.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 606, § 8.

CSA:

C. 143, § 125(8).

CRS 53:

§ 120-8-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-8.

43-3-209. Tax exemption.

The accomplishment by the department of transportation of the authorized purposes stated in this part 2 being for the benefit of the people of the state and for the improvement of their commerce and prosperity in which accomplishment the department of transportation will be performing essential governmental functions, the department of transportation shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments on any property acquired or used by it for the purposes provided in this part 2.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 606, § 9.

CSA:

C. 143, § 125(9).

CRS 53:

§ 120-8-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-9.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1116, § 168, effective July 1.

43-3-210. Refunding bonds.

The department of transportation is authorized to provide, by resolution of the transportation commission, for the issuance of refunding bonds of the state of Colorado for the purpose of refunding any bonds issued under the provisions of this part 2 and then outstanding. The issuance of the refunding bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the duties of the department of transportation in respect to the same shall be governed by the provisions of this part 2 insofar as the same may be applicable.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 606, § 10.

CSA:

C. 143, § 125(10).

CRS 53:

§ 120-8-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-10.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1117, § 169, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 465, § 7, effective April 23.

43-3-211. Rights of bondholders.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this part 2 or any of the coupons attached to said bonds and the trustee under the trust indenture, if any, except to the extent the rights given in this section may be restricted by resolution passed before the issuance of the bonds or by the trust indenture, either at law or in equity by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, may protect and enforce any and all rights granted under this section or under such resolution or trust indenture and may enforce and compel performance of any duties required by this part 2 or by such resolution or trust indenture to be performed by the department of transportation or any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of fees, fares, and tolls for the use of the turnpike project.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 606, § 11.

CSA:

C. 143, § 125(11).

CRS 53:

§ 120-8-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-11.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1117, § 170, effective July 1.

43-3-212. Effect of payment of bonds. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 49:

p. 607, § 12.

CSA:

C. 143, § 125(12).

CRS 53:

§ 120-8-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-12.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1117, § 171, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 465, § 8, effective April 23.

43-3-212.5. Disposition of tolls - when bonds issued.

If any bonds are issued pursuant to this part 2, any fees, fares, and tolls to be charged for the use of any turnpike shall be fixed and adjusted so that the fees, fares, and tolls collected, along with other revenues, if any, are at least sufficient to pay for, as applicable:

Any bonds issued pursuant to this part 2 and interest thereon, all sinking fund requirements, and any other requirements provided for by resolution of the transportation commission or by any trust indenture to which the department is a party; or

The reasonable return on investment of any private entity financing the project by means of a public-private initiative pursuant to section 43-3-202.5 and part 12 of article 1 of this title.

If amounts generated from the fees, fares, and tolls collected exceed the amount required in subsection (1) of this section, such fees, fares, and tolls shall then be used to pay the necessary costs for the proper operation, maintenance, and repair of any turnpike project.

If the transportation commission determines that a turnpike project is being adequately maintained, the department may use any proceeds in the special sinking fund in excess of the amounts required under subsections (1) and (2) of this section for the maintenance, construction, and operation of a network of turnpikes.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 466, § 9, effective April 23.

L. 98:

IP(1) amended, p. 1097, § 14, effective June 1.

43-3-212.6. Disposition of tolls - when bonds not issued.

If bonds are not issued pursuant to this part 2, any fees, fares, and tolls to be charged for the use of any turnpike shall be fixed and adjusted so that the fees, fares, and tolls collected, along with other revenues, if any, are at least sufficient to ensure, as applicable:

Reimbursement or payment to the department of transportation for all costs relating to or resulting from the turnpike project, including, but not limited to, costs for the design, finance, construction, operation, maintenance, improvement, and reconstruction of the turnpike, and for all works, facilities, and means necessary or convenient to the full exercise of the powers granted to the department of transportation under this part 2;

The reasonable return on investment of any private entity financing the turnpike project by means of a public-private initiative pursuant to section 43-3-202.5 and part 12 of article 1 of this title.

If amounts generated from the fees, fares, and tolls collected exceed the amount required in subsection (1) of this section and if the transportation commission determines that a turnpike project is being adequately maintained, the department of transportation may use any proceeds in excess of such amounts for the maintenance, construction, and operation of a network of turnpikes.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 466, § 9, effective April 23.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 1097, § 15, effective June 1.

43-3-213. No debt authorized.

Nothing in this part 2 shall be construed as authorizing the contracting by the state of a debt by loan in any form nor the pledging of general taxes of the state.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 607, § 13.

CSA:

C. 143, § 125(13).

CRS 53:

§ 120-8-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-13.

43-3-214. Succession of powers and duties.

It is the intention of this section that the powers conferred and the duties imposed on the department of transportation by this part 2 shall be exercised and performed by any corporation, commission, or department succeeding to the powers and duties of the department of transportation as now constituted and as extended by the provisions of this part 2.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 607, § 14.

CSA:

C. 143, § 125(14).

CRS 53:

§ 120-8-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-14.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1117, § 172, effective July 1.

43-3-215. Legislative declaration.

It is declared that the total interest payable on bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of sections 43-3-201 to 43-3-214 may be reduced by granting to the transportation commission the additional powers set forth in this part 2 in connection with the refunding of said bonds as authorized by section 43-3-210.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 796, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-15.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1118, § 173, effective July 1.

43-3-216. Additional powers.

In addition to the powers conferred upon it, the transportation commission has the power:

To establish escrow accounts in any bank within the state of Colorado which is a member of the federal deposit insurance corporation under protective agreements in amounts sufficient to insure the payment of any bonds refunded under the provisions of sections 43-3-201 to 43-3-214. Any or all of the accounts so established may be invested in direct obligations of the United States with appropriate maturities and yields to insure such payment. The term of any such escrow agreement shall not exceed five and one-half years.

To prescribe the terms, conditions, and manner in which such refunding bonds will be issued and sold and to provide for the payment of the costs of such refunding, including the fees of fiscal agents and attorneys and the charges of banks acting as escrow depositaries;

To do and perform all other things and acts, whether or not specifically enumerated in sections 43-3-201 to 43-3-214 or in sections 43-3-215 to 43-3-218, to effect a refunding of said bonds in order to effect a saving in interest cost to the state, but nothing in sections 43-3-215 to 43-3-218 shall be construed as authorizing the impairment of the obligation of contract.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 796, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-16.

L. 91:

IP(1) amended, p. 1118, § 174, effective July 1.

43-3-217. Execution.

Said refunding bonds may be executed in accordance with article 55 of title 11, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 797, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-17.

43-3-218. Bonds legal investments.

It is lawful for the bonds issued pursuant to this part 2 to be purchased by any bank, trust company, savings and loan association, investment company and association, executor, administrator, guardian, trustee, and other fiduciary. Public entities, as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), C.R.S., may invest public funds in such bonds only if said bonds satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 797, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-8-18.

L. 84:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1114, § 5, effective April 9.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1133, § 77, effective July 1.

43-3-219. Interest earnings.

All interest derived from the investment of the proceeds of the bonds issued pursuant to this part 2 shall, at the discretion of the department of transportation, be applied to the purposes for which the bonds are issued or shall be credited to the funds created by this part 2. The interest derived from the investment of the funds created by this part 2 shall remain in such funds.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 1114, § 6, effective April 9.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1118, § 175, effective July 1.

43-3-220. Notice of investment opportunity.

The department or the private entity responsible for issuing bonds under this part 2 may forward a copy of the bonds and a description of the investment opportunity for such bonds to any of the following for consideration under their respective statutory authority:

The board of trustees of the public employees' retirement association created under section 24-51-202, C.R.S.;

Repealed.

The board of directors of the fire and police pension association, as defined in section 31-31-102 (2), C.R.S.;

The boards of trustees of the firefighters' and police officers' old hire pension funds, as defined in section 31-30.5-102 (1.5), C.R.S.;

The board of trustees of the volunteer firefighter pension fund, as defined in section 31-30-1102 (1), C.R.S.;

Repealed.

The board of directors of the university of Colorado hospital authority, as defined in section 23-21-502 (2), C.R.S.;

The state treasurer for consideration under section 23-20-117.5, C.R.S.;

The county boards of retirement, as described in section 24-54-107, C.R.S.;

The governing boards of state colleges and universities, as defined in sections 24-54.5-102 (5) and 24-54.6-102 (4), C.R.S.; and

Any employer who has established a defined contribution plan.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 443, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2001:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1286, § 76, effective June 5.

L. 2009:

(1)(b) repealed, (SB 09-066), ch. 73, p. 260, § 25, effective July 1; (1)(d) amended, (HB 09-1030), ch. 16, p. 92, § 6, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1)(f) repealed, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2126, § 188, effective August 11.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1998 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 154, Session Laws of Colorado 1998.